Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 2. Resource Regulation.

§ 45.2-2004.
Powers and duties of the Department.

The Department has jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to enforce the provisions of this chapter and has the power and authority to make and enforce regulations and orders and do whatever is reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Any regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be adopted in compliance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

The Department shall:

Consult with the Board in carrying out its powers and duties pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;

Develop a comprehensive geothermal permitting system for the Commonwealth that provides for the exploration and development of geothermal resources;

Adopt regulations necessary to provide for geothermal drilling and the exploration for and development of geothermal resources in the Commonwealth. Such regulations shall be based on a system of correlative rights;

Establish minimum temperature levels and volumetric rates in order to determine Department jurisdiction over geothermal resource development. In establishing such temperature levels, the Department shall set (i) minimum temperature levels for permitting, well regulations, reservoir management, and allocation of geothermal resources and (ii) minimum volumetric rates for geothermal leasing, royalties, and severance taxes, as necessary. The Department shall review established temperature level and volumetric rate requirements biennially and revise the figures as necessary. Revision of temperature levels or volumetric rate requirements shall not occur more often than every two years, and such revision shall not operate retroactively; and

Consult with the State Department of Health as necessary to protect potable waters of the Commonwealth and to carry out the powers and duties of the Department pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.7; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Rights to geothermal resources. —

Rights to geothermal resources belong to the owner of the surface property unless specifically conveyed. They are not encompassed within mineral or water rights. Thus, a mineral or a water reservation does not reserve a geothermal resource, and a lease of oil, gas or some other mineral is not a lease of geothermal resources. The rights of the owner of a geothermal resource as related to the rights of owners of other property interests depend on the particular language of the instruments and all other relevant circumstances, as is the case generally in property law. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Terry G. Kilgore, Member, House of Delegates, No. 14-012,
(12/19/14).

§ 45.2-2005.
Reinjection policy.

The Department, the Board, and the State Department of Health shall jointly develop and revise as necessary a policy on reinjection of spent geothermal fluids. Such policy shall refer to the reinjection into the ground of waters extracted from the earth in the process of geothermal development, production, or utilization.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.8; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2006.
Cancellation or suspension of permit.

If the Department determines, after a public hearing held in conjunction with the Board, that a holder of a permit issued pursuant to the provisions of this chapter has willfully violated any provision of such permit or any provision of this chapter, the Department may cancel or suspend such permit for cause or impose limitations on the future use thereof in order to prevent future violations.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.9; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2007.
Penalties; injunctions.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a civil penalty of not less than $10 or more than $250 for each violation.

In addition, upon violation of any provision of this chapter or regulation of the Department adopted pursuant to this chapter, the Department may, either before or after the institution of proceedings pursuant to subsection A, institute a civil action in the circuit court where the well is located for injunctive relief to restrain the violation and for any other or further relief that the court deems proper.

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.10; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2008.
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision of the Department pursuant to the provisions of §

45.2-2006

is entitled to judicial review of such final decision in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.).

History.

1981, c. 506, § 45.1-179.11; 1986, c. 615; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.